Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2403
Interpreter; appointment.

In any proceeding the presiding judge shall appoint an interpreter to assist any person unable to communicate the English language for preparation and trial of his or her case.

Laws 1973, LB 116, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 13.